California statutes. Insurance Code
(B) Commencing the first day of the fifth month following the enactment of the 2008–09 Budget Act, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be seventeen dollars ($17) per child with a maximum required contribution of fifty-one dollars ($51) per month per family.

(C) Commencing November 1, 2009, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be twenty-four dollars ($24) per child with a maximum required contribution of seventy-two dollars ($72) per month per family.

(D) Subject to prior federal authorization, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be forty-two dollars ($42) per child with a maximum required contribution of one hundred twenty-six dollars ($126) per month per family, or any lesser increase in family contributions as is authorized by the federal Department of Health and Human Services. The family contribution required by this subparagraph shall commence the first day of the third month following the later of the following:

(i) The effective date of the act adding this subparagraph.

(ii) Receipt of federal authorization for the contribution in the form of an approved amendment to California’s state plan under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a waiver of one or more requirements of Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(c) Combinations of health, dental, and vision plans that are more expensive to the program than the highest cost Family Value Package may be offered to and selected by applicants. However, the cost to the program of those combinations that exceeds the price to the program of the highest cost Family Value Package shall be paid by the applicant as part of the family contribution.

(d) The board shall provide a family contribution discount to those applicants who select the health plan in a geographic area that has been designated as the Community Provider Plan. The discount shall reduce the portion of the family
 contribution described in subdivision (b) to the following:

(1) A family contribution of four dollars ($4) per child with a maximum required contribution of eight dollars ($8) per month per family for applicants with annual household incomes up to and including 150 percent of the federal poverty level.

(2) (A) Six dollars ($6) per child with a maximum required contribution of eighteen dollars ($18) per month per family for applicants with annual household incomes greater than 150 percent and up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level and for applicants on behalf of children described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70.

(B) Commencing the first day of the fifth month following the enactment of the 2008–09 Budget Act, the
 family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be nine dollars ($9) per child with a maximum required contribution of twenty-seven dollars ($27) per month per family.

(C) Commencing November 1, 2009, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be thirteen dollars ($13) per child with a maximum required contribution of thirty-nine dollars ($39) per month per family.

(D) Subject to prior federal authorization, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be twenty-seven dollars ($27) per child with a maximum required contribution of eighty-one dollars ($81) per month per family, or any lesser increase in family contributions as is authorized by the federal Department of Health and Human Services. The family contribution required by this subparagraph shall commence the first day of the third month following the later of the following:

(i) The effective date of the act adding this subparagraph.

(ii) Receipt of federal authorization for the contribution in the form of an approved amendment to California’s state plan under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a waiver of one or more requirements of Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(3) (A) On and after July 1, 2005, twelve dollars ($12) per child with a maximum required contribution of thirty-six dollars ($36) per month per family for applicants with annual household income to which subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 is applicable. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an application with an effective date prior to July 1, 2005, was based on annual household income to which subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 is applicable, then this subparagraph shall be applicable to the applicant on July 1, 2005, unless subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 is no longer applicable to the relevant family income. The program shall provide prior notice to any applicant for currently enrolled subscribers whose premium will increase on July 1, 2005, pursuant to this subparagraph and, prior to the date the premium increase takes effect, shall provide that applicant with an opportunity to demonstrate that subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 12693.70 is no longer applicable to the relevant family income.

(B) Commencing the first day of the fifth month following the enactment of the 2008–09 Budget Act, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be fourteen dollars ($14) per child with a maximum required contribution of forty-two dollars ($42) per month per
 family.

(C) Commencing November 1, 2009, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be twenty-one dollars ($21) per child with a maximum required contribution of sixty-three dollars ($63) per month per family.

(D) Subject to prior federal authorization, the family contribution pursuant to this paragraph shall be thirty-nine dollars ($39) per child with a maximum required contribution of one hundred seventeen dollars ($117) per month per family, or any lesser increase in family contributions as is authorized by the federal Department of Health and Human Services. The family contribution required by this subparagraph shall commence the first day of the third month following the later of the following:

(i) The effective date of the act adding this subparagraph.

(ii) Receipt of federal authorization for the contribution in the form of an approved amendment to California’s state plan under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a waiver of one or more requirements of Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(e) Applicants, but not family contribution sponsors, who pay three months of required family contributions in advance shall receive the fourth consecutive month of coverage with no family contribution required.

(f) Applicants, but not family contribution sponsors, who pay the required family contributions by an approved means of electronic fund transfer shall receive a 25-percent discount from the required family contributions.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the family contribution
 amounts described in this section comply with the premium cost-sharing limits contained in Section 2103 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. If the amounts described in subdivision (a) are not approved by the federal government, the board may adjust these amounts to the extent required to achieve approval of the state plan.

(h) The adoption and one readoption of regulations to implement paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law. For purpose of subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government code, the 120-day period, as applicable to
 the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 180 days.

(i) The board may adopt, and may only one time readopt, regulations to implement the changes to this section that are effective the first day of the fifth month following the enactment of the 2008–09 Budget Act. The adoption and one-time readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(j) The program shall provide prior notice to any applicant for a subscriber whose premium will increase as a result of amendments made to this section and shall provide the applicant with an
 opportunity to demonstrate that, based on reduced family income, the subscriber is subject to a lower premium pursuant to this section.

(k) The adoption and readoption, by the board, of regulations to implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.44.

(a) The board shall establish family contribution amounts for purchasing credit members that are equivalent to the amounts charged to subscribers participating in the purchasing pool portion of the program. Purchasing credit members shall not be required to pay family contribution amounts greater than the cost to the applicant if the purchasing credit members were enrolled in the purchasing pool component of the program. When calculating the cost to the applicant to participate in the purchasing pool, the family contribution discounts provided in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 12693.34 shall not be considered. Purchasing credit members shall be eligible for dental and vision coverage through the purchasing pool at no additional premium charge.

(b) The family contribution amounts paid on behalf of a purchasing credit member may be paid directly to the applicant’s employer through a payroll deduction or other mechanism.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.45.

(a) After two consecutive months of nonpayment of family contributions by an applicant, and a reasonable written notice period of no less than 30 days is provided to the applicant, subscribers or purchasing credit members may be disenrolled for an applicant’s failure to pay family contributions. The board may impose or contract for collection actions to collect unpaid family contributions.

(b) Subject to any additional requirements of federal law, disenrollments shall be effective at the end of the second consecutive month of nonpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 22.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.46.

The board may prohibit applicants who drop coverage after enrolling in the pool from reenrollment in the program for up to six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.47.

The program may place a lien on compensation or benefits, recovered or recoverable by a subscriber or applicant from any party or parties responsible for the compensation or benefits for which benefits have been provided under a policy issued under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.48.

The board may adjust payments made to a participating health plan if the board finds that the plan has a significantly disproportionate share of high- or low-risk subscribers. Prior to making this finding, the program shall obtain validated data from participating health plans. Reporting requirements shall be administratively compatible with the methods of operation of the health plans. Any adjustments to payments shall utilize demographic and other factors which are actuarially related to risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.49.

(a) When an applicant is dissatisfied with any action or inaction of a participating plan in which a subscriber is enrolled through the purchasing pool, the applicant shall first attempt to resolve the dispute with the participating plan according to its established policies and procedures.

(b) The board shall assure that all participating health, dental, and vision plans make subscribers aware of the regulatory oversight available to the applicant by the participating health, dental, or vision plan’s licensing or state oversight entity.

(c) The board shall assure that all participating health, dental, and vision plans report to the board, at least once a year, the number and types of benefit grievances filed by applicants on behalf of subscribers in the program. This information shall be available to applicants upon request in a format determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.50.

(a) The board shall consult and coordinate with the State Department of Health Services to implement the Medi-Cal to Healthy Families Accelerated Enrollment program pursuant to Section 14011.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The state shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan, necessary to implement Section 14011.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code in accordance with Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained shall Section 14011.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code be implemented.

(c) The board may adopt emergency regulations to implement the provision of accelerated eligibility benefits pursuant to this section and as described under Section 14011.65 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The emergency regulations shall include, but not be limited to, regulations that implement any changes in rules relating to program eligibility, enrollment, and disenrollment. The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and one readoption of those regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations, and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 80, Sec. 4.5.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.51.

(a) A transfer of enrollment from one participating health plan to another may be made by a subscriber at times and under conditions as may be prescribed by regulations of the board.

(b) The board shall provide for the transfer of coverage of any subscriber to another participating plan (1) if a contract with any participating plan under which the subscriber receives coverage is canceled or not renewed and (2) at least once a year upon request in a manner as determined by the board, and (3) if a subscriber moves to an area that the current health plan does not serve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.515.

(a) Effective July 1, 2004, any subscriber who affirmatively selects, or is assigned by default to, a federally qualified health center, as defined by Section 1396(d)(l)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a rural health clinic, as defined by Section 1396(d)(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or a primary care clinic that is licensed under Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, or is exempt from licensure under subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be deemed to have been assigned directly to the federally qualified health center, the rural health clinic, or the primary care clinic, and not to any individual provider who performs services on behalf of the federally qualified health center, the rural health clinic, or the primary care clinic.

(b) (1) When a subscriber is assigned, from any source, to a physician who is an employee of a federally qualified health center, a rural health clinic, or a primary care clinic, the assignment shall constitute an assignment to that federally qualified health center, rural health clinic, or primary care clinic for purposes of the subscriber’s health care coverage.

(2) When a subscriber is assigned, from any source, to a dentist who is an employee of a federally qualified health center, a rural health clinic, or a primary care clinic, the assignment shall constitute an assignment to that federally qualified health center, rural health clinic, or primary care clinic for purposes of the subscriber’s dental coverage.

(3) When a subscriber is assigned, from any source, to an optometrist who is an employee of a federally qualified health center, a rural health clinic, or a primary care clinic, the assignment shall constitute an assignment to that federally qualified health center, rural health clinic, or primary care clinic for purposes of the subscriber’s vision coverage.

(c) This section shall not limit any rights a subscriber may have to select an available primary care physician within a health care service plan’s service area pursuant to Section 1373.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.52.

The board may negotiate or arrange for stop-loss insurance coverage that limits the program’s fiscal responsibility for the total costs of health services provided to program subscribers, or arrange for participating health plans to share or assure the financial risk for a portion of the total cost of health care services to program subscribers, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.53.

The board shall develop and utilize appropriate cost containment measures to maximize the coverage offered under the program. Those measures may include limiting the expenditure of state funds for this purpose to the price to the state for the lowest cost plan contracting with the program and creation of program rules that restrict the ability of employers or applicants to drop existing coverage in order to qualify children for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.54.

A contract entered pursuant to this part shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. The board shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract, but may allocate funds to each contract based on the projected or actual subscriber enrollments to a total amount not to exceed the amount appropriate for the program including family contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.55.

(a) A health care provider who is furnished documentation of a person’s enrollment in the program shall not seek reimbursement nor attempt to obtain payment for any covered services provided to that person other than from the participating health plan covering that person or from other entities that the board enters into contracts or interagency agreements with to provide or pay for benefits under this part pursuant to Section 12693.26.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) do not apply to any copayments required under this part for the covered services provided to the person.

(c) For purposes of this section,
 “health care provider” means any professional person, organization, health facility, or other person or institution licensed by the state to deliver or furnish health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Health Benefits and Copayments [12693.60. - 12693.62.]

12693.60.

(a) Coverage provided to subscribers shall meet the federal coverage requirements in Section 2103 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. Except as otherwise provided in this part, the covered health benefits provided to subscribers shall be equivalent to those provided to state employees through the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the most recent plan year preceding the applicable program plan year, except that the plans may provide a mechanism for inpatient hospital care provided under the mental health benefit through which applicants may agree to a treatment plan in which each inpatient day may be substituted for two residential treatment days or three day treatment program days.

(b) The adoption and readoption, by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, of regulations to implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision, shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.61.

The following provisions apply for subscribers who have been identified by the participating health plans as potentially seriously emotionally disturbed.

(a) Participating plans, to the extent feasible, including plans receiving purchasing credits shall develop memoranda of understanding, consistent with criteria established by the board in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, for referral of subscribers who are seriously emotionally disturbed to a county mental health department. This referral does not relieve
 a participating plan from providing the mental health coverage specified in its contract, including assessment of, and development of, a treatment plan for serious emotional disturbance. Plans may contract with county mental health departments to provide for all, or a portion of, the services provided under the program’s mental health benefit.

(b) The board shall establish an accounting process under which counties providing services to subscribers who have been determined to be seriously emotionally disturbed pursuant to Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code can claim federal reimbursement for the services. The board shall reimburse counties pursuant to the rates set by the State Department of Health Care Services
 in accordance with Sections 5705, 14705.7, 14705, 14708, 14711, and 14718 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The actual amount reimbursed by the board shall be the federal share of the cost of the subscriber.

(c) This section shall only become operative with federal approval of the State Child Health Plan and the approval of federal financial participation.

(d) Counties choosing to enter into a memorandum of understanding pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide the nonfederal share of cost for the subscriber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 38.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

12693.615.

(a) The board shall establish the required subscriber copayment levels for specific benefits consistent with the limitations of Section 2103 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. The copayment levels established by the board shall, to the extent possible, reflect the copayment levels established for state employees, effective January 1, 1998, through the Public Employees’ Retirement System. Except as otherwise provided in this section, under no circumstances shall copayments exceed the copayment level established for state employees for the most recent plan year preceding the applicable program plan year through the Public Employees’ Retirement System. Total annual copayments charged to subscribers shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per family. The board shall instruct participating health plans to work with their provider networks to provide for extended payment plans for subscribers utilizing a
 significant number of health services for which copayments are charged. The board shall track the number of subscribers who meet the copayment maximum in each year and make adjustments in the amount if a significant number of subscribers reach the copayment maximum.

(b) No deductibles shall be charged to subscribers for health benefits.

(c) Coverage provided to subscribers shall not contain any preexisting condition exclusion requirements.

(d) No participating health, dental, or vision plan shall exclude any subscriber on the basis of any actual or expected health condition or claims experience of that subscriber or a member of that subscriber’s family.

(e) There shall be no variations in rates charged to subscribers including premiums and copayments, on the basis of any actual or expected health condition or claims experience of any subscriber or subscriber’s family member. The only variation in rates charged to subscribers, including copayments and premiums, that shall be permitted is that which is expressly authorized by Section 12693.43.

(f) There shall be no copayments for preventive services as defined in Section 1367.35 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) There shall be no annual or lifetime benefit maximums in any of the coverage provided under the program.

(h) Plans that receive purchasing credits pursuant to Section 12693.39 shall comply with subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g).

(i) (1) Effective October 1, 2011, or the first day of the month following 120 days after the federal approval required by subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3), whichever occurs later, copayments for emergency room and inpatient hospital services shall be set by the board as follows:

(A) Fifty dollars ($50) for outpatient emergency room services. The copayment shall be waived if the subscriber is hospitalized.

(B) One hundred dollars ($100) for each hospital inpatient day up to a maximum of two hundred dollars ($200) per admission.

(2) The changes made to the copayments in paragraph (1) shall not increase the maximum annual copayment of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per family described in subdivision (a).

(3) The changes made to the copayments in paragraph (1) shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, both of the following occur:

(A) The state receives prior federal authorization to implement the copayments in the form of an approved amendment to the state plan under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a waiver of one or more requirements of Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) The state receives prior federal authorization for, and implements, copayments in the same amounts for all children enrolled in the Medi-Cal program through an approved amendment to the state plan under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act or a waiver of one or more requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the state shall not implement the copayments otherwise required by this subdivision at an earlier date than the state implements copayments in the same amounts for all children in the Medi-Cal program.

(5) The adoption and readoption, by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, of regulations to implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision, shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 1.7.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.62.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a subscriber who is determined by the California Children’s Services Program to be eligible for benefits under the program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, a participating plan shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, the particular services authorized by the California Children’s Services Program for the particular subscriber for the treatment of a California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition. Participating plans shall refer a child who they reasonably suspect of having a medical condition that is eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Program to the California Children’s Services Program. The California Children’s Services Program shall provide case management and authorization of services if the child is found to be medically eligible for the California Children’s Services Program. Diagnosis and treatment services that are authorized by the California Children’s Services Program shall be performed by paneled providers for that program and approved special care centers of that program in accordance with treatment plans approved by the California Children’s Services Program. All other services provided under the participating plan shall be available to the subscriber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 17.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Dental Benefits and Copayments [12693.63. - 12693.64.]

12693.63.

(a) The board shall determine the dental benefits to be provided to subscribers by the program. These benefits shall be consistent with those provided to state employees through the Department of Personnel Administration, the predecessor to the Department of Human Resources, on July 1, 1997, except that orthodontia shall only be a benefit when it is determined to be medically necessary.

(b) The board shall establish the required subscriber copayment levels for dental benefits. The copayment levels established by the board shall, to the extent possible, reflect the copayment levels provided to state employees through the Department of Personnel Administration, the predecessor to the Department of Human Resources, on July 1,
 1997, except that no copayment shall be charged for medically necessary orthodontia services. There shall be no subscriber copayments for preventive and diagnostic services, including, but not limited to, examinations, teeth cleaning, X-rays, topical fluoride treatments, space maintainers, and sealants.

(c) No deductible shall be charged to subscribers for dental benefits.

(d) (1) The board may establish a cap on the amount of dental coverage provided to a subscriber in a given benefit year effective on and after the first day of the fifth month following enactment of the 2008–09 Budget Act. This dental coverage cap shall not be lower than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per subscriber per benefit year.

(2) The board may adopt, and may only one-time readopt, regulations to implement
 paragraph (1). The adoption and one-time readoption of a regulation authorized by this paragraph is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 903, Sec. 18.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.64.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a subscriber who is determined by the California Children’s Services Program to be eligible for benefits under the program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, a participating plan shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, the particular services authorized by the California Children’s Services Program for the particular subscriber for the treatment of a California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition. All other services provided under the participating plan shall be available to the subscriber.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Vision Benefits and Copayments [12693.65. - 12693.66.]

12693.65.

(a) Vision benefits shall be provided to subscribers and shall meet the federal coverage requirements in Section 2103 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

(b) The covered benefits shall be equivalent to those provided to state employees through the Department of Human Resources, except for tinted lenses and also photochromatic lenses, unless otherwise deemed medically necessary.

(c) The board shall establish the required subscriber copayment levels for vision benefits consistent with the limitations of Section 2103 of Title XXI of the Social Security Act. The copayment levels established by the board shall, to the extent possible, reflect the copayment levels provided to state employees through
 the Department of Human Resources.

(d) From March 1, 2011, to June 30, 2012, inclusive, the adoption and readoption, by the board, of regulations to modify vision benefits pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, restriction of providers through which covered vision benefits may be obtained, restriction of benefits for services from nonparticipating providers, or restriction of products and materials provided as benefits pursuant to this section, shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the board is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 174.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.66.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a subscriber who is determined by the California Children’s Services Program to be eligible for benefits under the program pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, a participating plan shall not be responsible for the provision of, or payment for, the particular services authorized by the California Children’s Services Program for the particular subscriber for the treatment of a California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition. All other services provided under the participating plan shall be available to the subscriber.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Linkages with Public Programs [12693.68. - 12693.69.]

12693.68.

The board shall encourage all plans, including those receiving purchasing credits, that provide services under the program to have viable protocols for screening and referring children needing supplemental services outside of the scope of the screening, preventive, and medically necessary and therapeutic services covered by the contract to public programs providing such supplemental services for which they may be eligible, as well as for coordination of care between the plan and the public programs. The public programs for which plans may be required to develop screening, referral, and care coordination protocols may include the California Children’s Services Program, the regional centers, county mental health programs, substance use disorder programs administered
 by the State Department of Health Care Services, and programs administered by local education agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 75.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.69.

A child enrolled in the Healthy Families Program who has a medical condition that is eligible for services pursuant to the California Children’s Services Program, and whose family is not financially eligible for the California Children’s Services Program, shall have the medically necessary treatment services for their California Children’s Services Program eligible medical condition authorized and paid for by the California Children’s Services Program. County expenditures for the payment of services for the child shall be waived and these expenditures shall be paid for by the state from Title XXI funds that are applicable and state general funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 18.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Eligibility [12693.70. - 12693.765.]

12693.70.

To be eligible to participate in the program, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be an applicant applying on behalf of an eligible child, which means a child who is all of the following:

(1) Less than 19 years of age. An application may be made on behalf of a child not yet born up to three months prior to the expected date of delivery. Coverage shall begin as soon as administratively feasible, as determined by the board, after the board receives notification of the birth. However, no child less than 12 months of age shall be eligible for coverage until 90 days after the enactment of the Budget Act of 1999.

(2) Not eligible for no-cost full-scope Medi-Cal or Medicare coverage at the time of application.

(3) In compliance with Sections 12693.71 and 12693.72.

(4) A child who meets citizenship and immigration status requirements that are applicable to persons participating in the program established by Title XXI of the Social Security Act, except as specified in Section 12693.76.

(5) A resident of the State of California pursuant to Section 244 of the Government Code; or, if not a resident pursuant to Section 244 of the Government Code, is physically present in California and entered the state with a job commitment or to seek employment, whether or not employed at the time of application to or after acceptance in, the program.

(6) (A) In either of the following:

(i) In a family with an annual or monthly household income equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level.
